Hawaii statutes.
§302L-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Advisory board" means the early
learning advisory board established pursuant to this chapter.

"At-risk children" means children
who, because of their home and community environment, are subject to language,
cultural, economic, and other disadvantages that cause them to be at risk for
school failure, including children:

(1) Who are eligible for special education services;

(2) Who are English as a second language learners;

(3) Who reside within a public school district,
established under chapter 302A, that is in need of improvement based on the
criteria of the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (Public Law 107-110),
as amended; or

(4) Whose family income is no more than two hundred
fifty per cent of the federal poverty level.

"Center-based" describes programs in
which early childhood education and care services are provided in a facility,
including private preschools, child care centers, and head start programs,
licensed, or excluded or exempt from licensing, by the department of human
services.

"Early childhood education" means a
developmentally appropriate early childhood development and education program
for children from birth until the time they enter kindergarten.

"Family child care program" means a
program in which a child is cared for in a family child care home licensed
under section 346-161.

"Family-child interaction learning
program" means a program attended by both a child and at least one adult
who is the child's parent, relative, or other caregiver, that facilitates
family-child interactive learning experiences for children and educates the
family member or members about how to encourage the child's learning.

"Family engagement" means practices that
engage families in recognition of the need for families to actively support
their child's learning and development, including classrooms that make families
feel welcome, communication with families on an ongoing basis, the promotion of
responsible parenting, and involvement in decisions that affect families and
their children.

"Home-based instruction program"
means a family-involvement, school-readiness program that helps families
prepare their child for success in school and beyond, and that is based in the
child's home; provided that home schooling is not a home-based instruction
program.

"Office" means the executive office
on early learning established pursuant to this chapter.

"Underserved children" means children
who have no access to, or are not qualified to attend, other early childhood
education programs and whose family income is no more than two hundred fifty
per cent of the federal poverty level. [L Sp 2008, c 14, pt of §2; am L 2012, c
178, §5; am L 2015, c 108, §3 and c 109, §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next